Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-893
Declarant; liability for repair and restoration.

The declarant is subject to liability for the prompt repair and restoration, to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium, of any portion of the condominium affected by the exercise of rights reserved pursuant to or created by sections 76-847 to 76-850, 76-852, and 76-853.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 69.